Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 209

Amendment of Articles

48-209-101. Authority to amend.

An LLC may amend its articles at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles or to delete a provision not required in the articles. Whether a provision is required or permitted in the articles is determined as of the effective date of the amendment.

A member of an LLC does not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the articles or operating agreement, including provisions relating to management, control, capital structure, distribution entitlement or purpose or duration of the LLC.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-209-102. Amendment by board of governors.

Unless the articles provide otherwise, the board of governors of a board-managed LLC may adopt one (1) or more amendments to the LLC's articles without member action to:

Delete the name and address of the initial registered agent or registered office, if a statement of change is on file with the secretary of state;

Designate or change the address of the principal office of the LLC;

Change the LLC's name by substituting the words “limited liability company” or the abbreviation “LLC,” for a similar word or abbreviation in the name, or by adding, deleting or changing a geographical attribution for the name;

Designate the street address and zip code of the LLC's current registered office, the county in which the office is located, and the name of its current registered agent at the office;

Delete the initial principal office, if an annual report is on file with the secretary of state; or

Make any other change expressly permitted by chapters 201-248 of this title to be made without member action.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-209-103. Amendment by board of governors and members.

The board of governors of a board-managed LLC may propose one (1) or more amendments to the articles for submission to the members.

For the amendment to be adopted:

The board of governors shall recommend the amendment to the members, unless the board of governors determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should make no recommendation and communicate the basis for its determination to the members with the amendment; and

The members entitled to vote on the amendment shall approve the amendment as provided in subsection (f).

The board of governors may condition its submission of the proposed amendment on any basis.

Notwithstanding the above, unless the articles or operating agreement provide otherwise, any member or group of members of either a board-managed or member- managed LLC entitled to call a meeting may propose an amendment to the articles and call a meeting of the members to consider such amendment.

The LLC shall notify each member, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed members' meeting in accordance with § 48-222-102. The notice of meeting must also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed amendment and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the amendment.

Unless chapters 201-248 of this title, the articles, or the board of governors (acting pursuant to subsection (c)) requires a greater vote, the amendment to be adopted must be approved by a majority vote of the members entitled to vote thereon.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 15.

48-209-104. Articles of amendment.

An LLC amending its articles shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the LLC;

The text of each amendment adopted;

The date of each amendment's adoption;

If an amendment was duly adopted by the board of governors without member action, a statement to that effect and that member action was not required; and

If an amendment was duly adopted by the members, a statement to that effect.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-209-105. Restated articles.

An LLC's board of governors may restate its articles at any time with or without member action.

The restatement may include one (1) or more amendments to the articles. If the restatement includes an amendment requiring member approval, it shall be adopted as provided in § 48-209-103.

If the board of governors submits a restatement for member action, the LLC shall notify each member, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed members' meeting in accordance with § 48-222-102. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed restatement and contain or be accompanied by a copy of the restatement that identifies any amendment or other change it would make in the articles.

An LLC restating its articles shall deliver to the secretary of state the restated articles, setting forth the name of the LLC and the text of the restated articles, together with a certificate setting forth:

Whether the restatement contains an amendment to the articles requiring member approval and, if it does not, that the board of governors adopted the restatement; or

If the restatement contains an amendment to the articles requiring member approval, the information required by § 48-209-104.

If the restatement contains an amendment to the articles, it shall be designated in the heading as “Amended and Restated Articles.”

The restated articles must contain all the requirements of articles as set out in § 48-205-101.

Duly adopted and restated articles supersede the original articles and all prior amendments thereto.

The secretary of state may certify restated articles as the articles currently in effect, without including the certificate information required by subsection (d).

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-209-106. Amendment to articles pursuant to reorganization.

An LLC's articles may be amended without action by the board of governors or members to carry out a plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by a court of competent jurisdiction under federal statute, if the articles after amendment contain only provisions required or permitted by § 48-205-101.

The individual or individuals designated by the court shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the LLC;

The text of each amendment approved by the court;

The date of the court's order or decree approving the articles of amendment;

The title of the reorganization proceeding in which the order or decree was entered; and

A statement that the court had jurisdiction of the proceeding under federal statute.

Members of an LLC undergoing reorganization do not have dissenters' rights except as and to the extent provided in the reorganization plan.

This section does not apply after entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceedings, even though the court retains jurisdiction of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to consummation of the reorganization plan.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-209-107. Effect of amendment.

An amendment to the articles does not affect a cause of action existing against or in favor of the LLC, a proceeding to which the LLC is a party or the existing rights of persons other than members of the LLC. An amendment changing an LLC's name does not abate a proceeding brought by or against the LLC in its former name.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.